California, session 20252026, AB1242.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that this act aligns with Executive Order No. N-16-22, which committed to strengthening equity and language access, and the California Health and Human Services Agency’s Language Access Plan Guidance Document.SEC. 2. Section 7295.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:7295.2. Every state agency that serves or is eligible to serve a substantial number of non-English-speaking people and that provides materials in English explaining services shall also provide the same type of materials in any non-English language spoken by a substantial number of the public served or that is eligible to be served by the agency. Whenever notice of the availability of materials explaining services available is given, orally or in writing, it shall be given in English and in the non-English language into which any materials have been translated. This section shall not be interpreted to require verbatim translations of any materials provided in English by a state agency.SEC. 3. Section 7295.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:7295.4. Whenever a state agency finds that the factors listed in both subdivisions (a) and (c) or (b) and (c) exist, it shall distribute the applicable written materials in the appropriate non-English language through its statewide and local offices or facilities to non-English-speaking persons, or, as an alternative, the state agency may instead elect to furnish translation aids or translation guides or provide assistance, through use of a qualified bilingual person, at its statewide and local offices or facilities in completing English forms or questionnaires and in understanding English forms, letters, or notices:(a) The written materials, whether forms, applications, questionnaires, letters, or notices solicit or require the furnishing of information from an individual or provide that individual with information.(b) The information solicited, required, or furnished affects or may affect the individual’s rights, duties, or privileges with regard to that agency’s services or benefits.(c) The statewide or local office or facility of the agency with which the individual is dealing, serves or is eligible to serve a substantial number of non-English-speaking persons. people.SEC. 4. Section 7296.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:7296.2. As used in Sections 7292, 7295.2, 7295.4, 7299.3, and 7299.4, a “substantial number of non-English-speaking people” are members of a group who either do not speak English, or who are unable to effectively communicate in English because it is not their native language, language and who comprise 5 percent or more of the people served or eligible to be served by the statewide or any local office or facility of a state agency. higher of either of the following:(a) The people served by the statewide or any local office or facility of a state agency.(b) The people eligible to be served by the statewide or any local office or facility of a state agency as determined by the data obtained by a state agency according to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7299.4.SEC. 5. Section 7299.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:7299.3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, by July 1, 2015, a state agency subject to the requirements of this chapter shall translate and make accessible on the homepage of its internet website forms and processes for submitting complaints of alleged violations of this chapter, chapter as referenced in paragraph (15) of subdivision (b) of Section 7299.4. The forms and processes shall be translated into all languages spoken by a substantial number of non-English-speaking people served or eligible to be served by the state agency. Translated copies of the forms shall be printed and made available in the statewide office and any local office or facility of the state agency.SEC. 6. Section 7299.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:7299.4. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, each state agency shall conduct an assessment and survey of the language needs of non-English-speaking and limited-English-speaking people, and develop and update an implementation plan that complies with the requirements of this chapter, utilizing all of the following information:(1) The most recent census data from the United States Census Bureau, or recent data from any other relevant databases, including, but not limited to, both of the following:(A) English Learner Data, available on the DataQuest reporting system provided by the State Department of Education.(B) Language Microdata for California, and any other language database that is based on the census and includes limited English proficiency by ZIP Code and census tract, available on the DRU Data Portal provided by the Department of Finance.(2) Community-level input from various mechanisms, including focus groups, roundtables, and advisory bodies, especially during times of emergencies.(3) Any relevant factors other than those described in paragraphs (1) and (2), including levels of linguistic isolation and percentages of limited English proficiency within each language group.(b) Each agency shall conduct the assessment of language needs and language survey of each of its statewide and local offices every two years to determine and provide all of the following:(1) The name, position, and contact information of the employee designated by the agency responsible for complying with this chapter.(2) The number of public contact positions in each statewide and local office.(3) The number of qualified bilingual employees in public contact positions in each statewide and local office, and the languages they speak or use, other than English.(4) The number and percentage of non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking people served or eligible to be served by each statewide and local office, broken down by native language based on any of the information described in subdivision (a) to assess the language needs of the non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking populations in each statewide or local offices service area.(5) The number of anticipated vacancies in public contact positions.(6) Whether the use of other available options, including contracted video- or telephone-based interpretation services, in addition to qualified bilingual persons in public contact positions, is serving the language needs of the people served by the agency.(7) A list of all written materials that are required to be translated or otherwise made accessible to non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking individuals people by Sections 7295.2 and 7295.4.(8) A list of materials identified in paragraph (7) that have been translated and languages into which they have been translated.(9) The number of additional qualified bilingual public contact staff, if any, needed at each statewide and local office to comply with this chapter based on any of the information described in subdivision (a).(10) A detailed description of the agency’s procedures for identifying written materials that are required to be translated.(11) Each agency shall calculate the percentage of non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking people served or eligible to be served by each statewide and local office by rounding the percentage arrived at to the nearest whole percentage point.(12) A detailed description of the agency’s procedures for identifying language needs at statewide and local offices and assigning qualified bilingual staff to those offices, based on the number and percentage of non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking populations residing within each statewide and local office service area, as determined by any of the information described in subdivision (a).(13) A detailed description of how the agency recruits qualified bilingual staff in statewide and local offices.(14) A detailed description of any training the agency provides to its staff on the provision of services to non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking individuals, frequency of training, and date of most recent training.(15) A detailed description of complaints regarding language access received by the agency and the agency’s procedures for accepting and resolving complaints of an alleged violation due to failure to make available translated documents or provide interpreter service through bilingual staff or contract services.(16) A detailed description of how the agency complies with any federal or other state laws that require the provision of linguistically accessible services to the public.(17) Any other relevant information requested by the Department of Human Resources.(c) The language assessment, survey results, and any additional information requested shall be reported in the form and at the time required by the Department of Human Resources, Resources and delivered to the department not later than October 1 of every even-numbered year.(d) Every odd-numbered year, each agency that served or was eligible to serve a substantial number of non-English-speaking people shall develop an implementation plan that provides a detailed description of how the agency plans to address any deficiencies in meeting the requirements of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the failure to translate written materials or employ sufficient numbers of qualified bilingual employees in public contact positions at statewide and local offices, the proposed actions to be taken to address the deficiencies, and the proposed dates by when the deficiencies will be remedied.(e) In developing its implementation plan, each state agency may rely upon data gathered from its most recent language survey and assessment.(f) Each state agency shall submit its implementation plan to the Department of Human Resources no later than October 1 of each applicable year. The Department of Human Resources shall review each implementation plan, plan and, if it determines that the implementation plan fails to address the identified deficiencies, shall order the agency to supplement or make changes to its plan. A state agency that has been determined to be deficient shall report to the Department of Human Resources every six months on its progress in addressing the identified deficiencies.(g) If the Department of Human Resources determines that a state agency has not made reasonable progress toward complying with this chapter, the department shall issue orders that it deems appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.SEC. 7. Section 7299.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:7299.6. The Department of Human Resources shall review the results of the language assessments, surveys, and implementation plans required to be made by Section 7299.4, compile this data, and provide a report to the Legislature every two years. The report shall meet all of the following requirements:(a) The report shall identify significant problems or deficiencies and propose solutions where warranted.(b) The report shall include each state agency’s language assessment, survey results, and implementation plan.(c) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.SEC. 8. Division 115 (commencing with Section 135000) is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:DIVISION 115. Language Access Director135000. There is hereby established within the The California Health and Human Services Agency the shall designate a Language Access Director to provide critical oversight, accountability, and coordination across various state departments and agencies to ensure individuals with limited English proficiency and individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing have meaningful access to government programs and services.135001. For the purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Interpretation” means the process of understanding and analyzing a spoken or signed message and re-expressing that message faithfully, accurately, and objectively in another language, taking the cultural and social context into account.(b) “Limited English proficiency” means individuals who do not speak English as their primary language and who have a limited ability to read, write, speak, or understand English, and are eligible to receive language assistance with respect to services, benefits, or challenges encountered.(c) (1) “Qualified interpreter” means a person who satisfies all of the following:(A) Demonstrated proficiency in both English and the target language.(B) Knowledge in both English and the target language of health care and other appropriate terminology and concepts relevant to health care or social services delivery systems.(C) Adherence to generally accepted interpreter ethics and principles, including, but not limited to, client confidentiality.(2) “Qualified interpreter” does not mean a person who provides oral interpretation using a machine or done online, including, but not limited to, providing interpretation using an online, machine-based interpreter service or artificial intelligence, unless a person reviews and appropriately corrects the interpretation before the final interpretation reaches its intended audience.(d) (1) “Qualified translator” means a person who satisfies all of the following:(A) Demonstrated proficiency in both English and the target language.(B) Knowledge in both English and the target language of health care and other appropriate terminology and concepts relevant to health care or social services delivery systems.(C) Adherence to generally accepted translator ethics and principles, including, but not limited to, client confidentiality.(2) “Qualified translator” does not mean a person who makes a translation using a machine or done online, including, but not limited to, making a translation using an online, machine-based translation service or artificial intelligence, unless the person reviews and appropriately revises the translation before the final translation reaches its intended audience.(e) “Translation” means the conversion of written text into the corresponding written text in a different language, taking cultural and social context into account. “Translation” does not include the conversion of written text into the corresponding written text in a different language made by a machine or done online, including, but not limited to, through the use of an online, machine-based translation service or artificial intelligence, unless a qualified translator reviews and appropriately revises the translation before the final translation reaches its intended audience.135002. The Language Access Director shall do all of the following:(a) Lead the implementation, monitoring, and periodic updating of Language Access Plans within the California Health and Human Services Agency, which shall include both of the following:(1) A Language Access Plan for each department and office within the California Health and Human Services Agency, as required by Section 135003.(2) The California Health and Human Services Agency’s Language Access Plan Guidance Document, as required by subdivision (h). (g).(b) Coordinate with the language access coordinators from the various departments and offices within the California Health and Human Services Agency to implement each departments’ and offices’ Language Access Plan.(c) Increase the provision of language assistance services, including translation and interpreter services, through various options, which may include, but are not limited to, hiring bilingual staff and contracting with community-based organizations and third-party vendors.(d) Ensure the use of qualified interpreters and qualified translators for any language assistance provided to persons with limited English proficiency or persons who are deaf or hard of hearing.(e) Ensure each Language Access Plan, as required by Section 135003, includes all of the following:(1) Methods to identify individuals with limited English proficiency who require language assistance, including both of the following:(A) A demographic assessment of the department’s service population.(B) An effective system of recording and utilizing spoken, sign, and written language preferences, including processes to identify the correct linguistic variant.(2) Language assistance measures and information about the ways that language assistance will be provided, including all of the following:(A) The types of services available, including both of the following:(i) How a department or office will provide free sign language interpretation and oral interpretation services in a language and linguistic variant, upon request, for all public contacts, including sight translation of vital documents pursuant to the California Health and Human Services Agency’s Language Access Plan Guidance Document.(ii) How the department or office will use the safe harbor provisions described in pages 47311 and 47319 in Volume 68 of the Federal Register to determine the languages that a vital document shall be translated into.(B) How staff can obtain those services.(C) How to respond to an individual who requires language assistance, including via telephone, written communication, and in-person contact.(D) Ensuring the competency of qualified interpreters and qualified translators.(3) (A) Training for staff to ensure they know about policies, procedures, and best practices related to the provision of meaningful language access.(B) Ensuring staff who have contact with the public are trained to work effectively with in-person, video, and telephone interpreters.(4) Notice for individuals containing the language services that are available at no cost for an individual with limited English proficiency or, to the extent that a service area exists, who reside in its service area and are eligible for services.(5) A mechanism to do both of the following:(A) Monitor the implementation of the plan.(B) (i) Update the plan every two years, which shall include whether new documents, programs, services, and activities shall be made accessible for individuals with limited English proficiency and who are deaf or hard of hearing.(ii) When reviewing a plan for updates, the Language Access Director may also consider all of the following:(I) Changed demographics.(II) An analysis of internal and external data.(III) Responses to new and unexpected language needs.(IV) Assessment and measures of client satisfaction.(V) Capacity-building efforts regarding funding, staffing, and training.(f)Collect data from the various departments and offices within the California Health and Human Services Agency to create the report required in Section 135004. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the information described in subdivision (b) of Section 135004.(g)(f) Ensure a document is translated if an individual with limited English proficiency submits a written request to the California Health and Human Services Agency, or any of its departments or offices, that the document be translated into the individual’s preferred language.(h)(g) Develop a Language Access Plan Guidance Document to support the various departments and offices within the California Health and Human Services Agency in their development of a language access plan.135003. Each department and office within the California Health and Human Services Agency shall do both of the following:(a) Develop a Language Access Plan, Plan as described in subdivision (e) of Section 135002.(b) Delegate a coordinator to work with the Language Access Director to achieve the purposes of this division.135005.135004. Commencing no later than January 1, 2027, the Language Access Director shall engage communities with limited English proficiency and deaf and hard of hearing communities to assist in expanding access to the programs and services provided by the California Health and Human Services Agency and the various departments and offices within the agency, including, but not limited to, by doing both of the following:(a) Conducting targeted outreach to communities who are limited English proficient or deaf and hard of hearing to solicit advice on policies and practices affecting individuals who are eligible for the California Health and Human Services Agency’s department’s and offices’ services and benefits and provide input and feedback to the agency about its language access plan and policies.(b) Marketing and promoting those programs and services in a variety of languages to the general public and limited-English-proficient communities.135006.135005. The California Health and Human Services Agency shall, from funds appropriated to it in the Budget Act of 2023 (Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023), allocate sufficient funds to implement and carry out the provisions of this division, including the requirement for the departments and offices within the agency to assign a language access coordinator, as required by subdivision (a) (b) of Section 135003.